test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/spellertests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Compound tests: # testing different compounding patterns that should be accepted:
    gålle+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#giella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#bálkká+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: gålle#giella#bálkká
    giella+N: ~giel
    gålle+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#giella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gålle#giella, ~gålle#giel]
    giella+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp#gålle+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~giel#gålle, giella#gålle]
    e-mæjlla+N+Sg+Nom: [e-mæjlla, e-mäjlla]
    e-mæjlla+N+Cmp#adræssa+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Ill: [e-mæjlla#adræssaj, e-mäjlla#adræssaj, e-mäjlla#adrässaj, e-mæjlla#adrässaj]
    priváhtta+A+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp-#e-mæjlla+N+Sg+Nom: [priváhta-#e-mæjlla, priváhta-#e-mäjlla]
    priváhtta+A+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#e-mæjlla+N+Sg+Nom:  [~priváhta#e-mæjlla, ~priváhta#e-mäjlla]
    priváhtta+A+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#e-mæjlla+N+Sg+Nom:           [~priváhta#e-mæjlla, ~priváhta#e-mäjlla]
